tests/wiki_curt.yaml
  "The noun шоссе":
    шоссе<n><nom> :  шоссе 
    шоссе<n><gen> :  шоссен 
    шоссе<n><dat> :  шоссене 
    шоссе<n><loc> :  шоссере 
    шоссе<n><abl> :  шоссерен 
    шоссе<n><ins> :  шоссепе 
    шоссе<n><abe> :  шоссесӗр 
    шоссе<n><term> :  шоссешӗн
    шоссе<n><px1sg><nom> :  шоссем 
    шоссе<n><px1sg><gen> :  шоссемӗн 
    шоссе<n><px1sg><dat> :  шоссеме 
    шоссе<n><px2sg><nom> :  шоссӳ 
    шоссе<n><px2sg><gen> :  шоссӳн 
    шоссе<n><px2sg><dat> :  шоссӳе 
    шоссе<n><px3sp><nom> :  шосси 
    шоссе<n><px3sp><gen> :  шоссин
    шоссе<n><px3sp><dat> :  шоссине 
    шоссе<n><px1pl><nom> :  шоссемӗр 
    шоссе<n><px1pl><gen> :  шоссемӗрӗн 
    шоссе<n><px1pl><dat> :  шоссемӗре 
    шоссе<n><px2pl><nom> :  шоссер 
    шоссе<n><px2pl><gen> :  шоссерӗн 
    шоссе<n><px2pl><dat> :  шоссере 
    шоссе<n><pl><nom> :  шоссесем 
    шоссе<n><pl><gen> :  шоссесен 
    шоссе<n><pl><dat> :  шоссесене 
    шоссе<n><pl><loc> :  шоссесенче 
    шоссе<n><pl><abl> :  шоссесенчен 
    шоссе<n><pl><ins> :  шоссесемпе 
    шоссе<n><pl><abe> :  шоссесемсӗр 
    шоссе<n><pl><term> :  шоссесемшӗн

  "The noun шӑши":
    шӑши<n><nom> :  шӑши 
    шӑши<n><gen> :  шӑшин
    шӑши<n><dat> :  шӑшие 
    шӑши<n><loc> :  шӑшире 
    шӑши<n><abl> :  шӑширен 
    шӑши<n><ins> :  шӑшипе 
    шӑши<n><abe> :  шӑшисӗр 
    шӑши<n><term> :  шӑшишӗн
    шӑши<n><px1sg><nom> :  шӑшийӗм 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><gen> :  шӑшийӗмӗн 
    шӑши<n><px1sg><dat> :  шӑшийӗме 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><nom> :  шӑшийӳ 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><gen> :  шӑшийӳн 
    шӑши<n><px2sg><dat> :  шӑшийӗве 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><nom> :  шӑшийӗ 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><gen> :  шӑшийӗн 
    шӑши<n><px3sp><dat> :  шӑшийне 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗмӗр 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗмӗрӗн 
    шӑши<n><px1pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗмӗре 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><nom> :  шӑшийӗр 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><gen> :  шӑшийӗрӗн 
    шӑши<n><px2pl><dat> :  шӑшийӗре 
    шӑши<n><pl><nom> :  шӑшисем 
    шӑши<n><pl><gen> :  шӑшисен 
    шӑши<n><pl><dat> :  шӑшисене 
    шӑши<n><pl><loc> :  шӑшисенче 
    шӑши<n><pl><abl> :  шӑшисенчен 
    шӑши<n><pl><ins> :  шӑшисемпе 
    шӑши<n><pl><abe> :  шӑшисемсӗр 
    шӑши<n><pl><term> :  шӑшисемшӗн

  "The noun ҫурт":
    ҫурт<n><nom> :  ҫурт 
    ҫурт<n><gen> :  ҫуртӑн 
    ҫурт<n><dat> :  ҫурта 
    ҫурт<n><loc> :  ҫуртра 
    ҫурт<n><abl> :  ҫуртран 
    ҫурт<n><ins> :  ҫуртпа 
    ҫурт<n><abe> :  ҫуртсӑр 
    ҫурт<n><term> :  ҫуртшӑн
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><nom> :  ҫуртӑм 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><gen> :  ҫуртӑмӑн 
    ҫурт<n><px1sg><dat> :  ҫуртӑма 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><nom> :  ҫурту 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><gen> :  ҫуртун 
    ҫурт<n><px2sg><dat> :  ҫуртна
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><nom> :  ҫурчӗ 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><gen> :  ҫурчӗн 
    ҫурт<n><px3sp><dat> :  ҫуртне 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><nom> :  ҫуртӑмӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><gen> :  ҫуртӑмӑрӑн 
    ҫурт<n><px1pl><dat> :  ҫуртӑмӑра 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><nom> :  ҫуртӑр 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><gen> :  ҫуртӑрӑн 
    ҫурт<n><px2pl><dat> :  ҫуртӑра 
    ҫурт<n><pl><nom> :  ҫуртсем 
    ҫурт<n><pl><gen> :  ҫуртсен 
    ҫурт<n><pl><dat> :  ҫуртсене 
    ҫурт<n><pl><loc> :  ҫуртсенче 
    ҫурт<n><pl><abl> :  ҫуртсенчен 
    ҫурт<n><pl><ins> :  ҫуртсемпе 
    ҫурт<n><pl><abe> :  ҫуртсемсӗр 
    ҫурт<n><pl><term> :  ҫуртсемшӗн

  "The noun ҫын":
    ҫын<n><nom> :  ҫын 
    ҫын<n><gen> :  ҫыннӑн 
    ҫын<n><dat> :  ҫынна 
    ҫын<n><loc> :  ҫынра 
    ҫын<n><abl> :  ҫынран
    ҫын<n><ins> :  ҫынпа 
    ҫын<n><abe> :  ҫынсӑр 
    ҫын<n><term> :  ҫыншӑн
    ҫын<n><px1sg><nom> :  ҫыннӑм 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><gen> :  ҫыннӑмӑн 
    ҫын<n><px1sg><dat> :  ҫыннӑма 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><nom> :  ҫынну 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><gen> :  ҫыннун 
    ҫын<n><px2sg><dat> :  ҫынуна 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><nom> :  ҫынни 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><gen> :  ҫыннин 
    ҫын<n><px3sp><dat> :  ҫыннине 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><nom> :  ҫыннӑмӑр 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><gen> :  ҫыннӑмӑрӑн 
    ҫын<n><px1pl><dat> :  ҫыннӑмӑра 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><nom> :  ҫыннӑр 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><gen> :  ҫыннӑрӑн 
    ҫын<n><px2pl><dat> :  ҫыннӑра 
    ҫын<n><pl><nom> :  ҫынсем 
    ҫын<n><pl><gen> :  ҫынсен 
    ҫын<n><pl><dat> :  ҫынсене 
    ҫын<n><pl><loc> :  ҫынсенче 
    ҫын<n><pl><abl> :  ҫынсенчен 
    ҫын<n><pl><ins> :  ҫынсемпе 
    ҫын<n><pl><abe> :  ҫынсемсӗр 
    ҫын<n><pl><term> :  ҫынсемшӗн

  "The noun ӗҫ":
    ӗҫ<n><nom> :  ӗҫ 
    ӗҫ<n><gen> :  ӗҫӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><dat> :  ӗҫе 
    ӗҫ<n><loc> :  ӗҫре 
    ӗҫ<n><abl> :  ӗҫрен 
    ӗҫ<n><ins> :  ӗҫпе 
    ӗҫ<n><abe> :  ӗҫсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><term> :  ӗҫшӗн
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><nom> :  ӗҫӗм 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><gen> :  ӗҫӗмӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px1sg><dat> :  ӗҫӗме 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><nom> :  ӗҫӳ 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><gen> :  ӗҫӳн 
    ӗҫ<n><px2sg><dat> :  ӗҫне
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><nom> :  ӗҫӗ 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><gen> :  ӗҫӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px3sp><dat> :  ӗҫне 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗмӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗмӗрӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px1pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗмӗре 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><nom> :  ӗҫӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><gen> :  ӗҫӗрӗн 
    ӗҫ<n><px2pl><dat> :  ӗҫӗре 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><nom> :  ӗҫсем 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><gen> :  ӗҫсен 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><dat> :  ӗҫсене 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><loc> :  ӗҫсенче 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><abl> :  ӗҫсенчен 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><ins> :  ӗҫсемпе 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><abe> :  ӗҫсемсӗр 
    ӗҫ<n><pl><term> :  ӗҫсемшӗн
